Mississippi, session 2026, HB4173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jeremy Hodges of Leflore County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Uttering Forgery in Leflore County, on December 11, 2006, for which he was sentenced to serve two (2) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released to Earned Release Supervision on November 20, 2007.  He was discharged on January 19, 2008.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.